Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 66 The Rhode Island School Staff Institute

16-66-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island School Staff Institute Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 59, § 1.

16-66-2.
Findings.

The general assembly has found and declares that:

In-service education is different from pre-service education. Effective staff development programs are directed at educational improvements and also encourage the professional development of individual participants.

In-service education, whether local, state, or federally supported, must be designed as an integral part of the school program.

The most effective in-service education programs are those with a high degree of participant control.

In-service education programs most beneficial to students are those designed primarily to improve the quality of teaching in a school or department of a school.

In-service education programs most beneficial to school department staff are those that are designed to improve professional practices and/or provide professional growth and stimulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 59, § 1.

16-66-3.
Institute created.

The Rhode Island school staff institute is created as a part of the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 59, § 1.

16-66-4.
Operations.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall:

Establish policies and procedures for the institute consistent with this chapter.

Carry out the following responsibilities:

Receive, process, and approve requests for in-service education program grants;

Inform all school systems of opportunities and resources available for in-service education;

Help to create new and productive relationships among colleges, collaboratives, school systems, and others concerned with in-service education;

Maintain an in-service resource file;

Work with school staffs as they prepare their program grant proposals;

Consult with the advisory board in the development of new ways of providing in-service education;

Provide staff to work with the advisory board;

Monitor funded institute programs.

Fund the operation of the institute and institute programs with income from the following sources:

Those federal categorical funds available to the department and designated for in-service education, though a certain amount of these funds may be retained by the department for state in-service programs.

Any funds that may be appropriated for the institute by the general assembly.

Other funds from governmental and non-governmental sources which may be made available to the department for the purpose of funding the institute.

Institute programs and program grants. The initiative for applying for institute grants to conduct in-service programs rests with school personnel who have a common objective and a plan to meet that objective through in-service education. Once an institute program is approved and funded by the department, its operation is the responsibility of the initiating group. Programs shall be approved, funded, and operated on the following principles:

Institute programs will be designed to meet federal guidelines, state priorities, and/or local needs as identified by local school staff.

Institute programs should help groups with shared objectives and responsibilities to improve the instructional program or educational services offered in their schools.

Members of school staffs or others who will be directly affected by the in-service programs must be invited to participate.

Participation in in-service programs will be voluntary.

Participants will plan their own programs, determine program format, choose consultants, and monitor and adapt programs in progress.

Institute programs should respond to a diversity of school, staff, and student needs, and consultants recommended for their demonstrated capacity to help achieve program goals may come from a wide variety of fields (e.g., business, health, government, the arts, education). Institute programs will encourage new and productive relationships between schools, their communities, and the society at large.

Administrators, teachers, related services personnel, or others whose support is essential to achieving and sustaining program goals should be actively involved in the program and implementation of its objectives.

Programs will be offered on site unless participants determine otherwise.

Professional recognition for participation in Rhode Island school staff institute programs will be determined on the local level.

The department of elementary and secondary education will encourage schools to provide incentives for participation.

The awarding of academic credit, if any, will be decided by participating institution(s) in consultation with the participants.

Consultants who conduct the in-service will be evaluated by participants.

The department of elementary and secondary education will fund only those programs that give evidence of participatory planning and that use resources and consultants of high quality.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 59, § 1.

16-66-5.
Institute program grant funds — Restrictions on use.

Institute program grants may be used to pay for consultants, materials, and certain incidental expenses when these are approved by the department of elementary and secondary education; they may not be used to pay for tuition, stipends, substitutes for participants, meals, conference space, or indirect costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 59, § 1.

16-66-6.
Advisory board.

The school staff institute advisory board is created, consisting of the following seventeen (17) members: eight (8) school teachers, four (4) to be appointed by the president of the Rhode Island Federation of Teachers and four (4) to be appointed by the president of the National Education Association of Rhode Island; one superintendent of schools, to be appointed by the president of the Rhode Island Association of School Superintendents; one school principal, to be appointed by the president of the Rhode Island Association of School Principals; one school committee member, to be appointed by the president of the Rhode Island Association of School Committees; three (3) higher education representatives, one to be appointed by the commissioner of higher education in consultation with the president of the University of Rhode Island, one to be appointed by the commissioner of higher education in consultation with the president of Rhode Island College, and one representing a nonpublic institution of higher education and appointed by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education in consultation with the commissioner of higher education; one public member to be appointed by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education; one member of the house of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house; and one member of the senate, to be appointed by the president of the senate. The house and senate appointees shall be nonvoting members of the advisory board.

With the exception of the house and senate members, the members of the advisory board shall serve two (2) year terms until the time as their successors shall be appointed. The house and senate members shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority.

The advisory board shall organize itself at a meeting called by the speaker of the house in July of each odd numbered year.

Members of the advisory board shall receive no compensation.

The advisory board shall elect a chairperson and any other officers as it deems appropriate.

The advisory board will review and make recommendations to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education relative to all aspects of the Rhode Island school staff institute including, but not limited to, implementation and delivery of services and funding, program approvals and denials, fiscal data, evaluation, and dissemination.

The advisory board shall submit a report on the institute to the general assembly in January of each year; this report shall include but not be limited to recommendations regarding institute funding for the next fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 57; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 17.